District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1241

Definitions.

Repealed.

Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 202, 42 DCR 3684
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 5202(b), 51 DCR 8441
1981 Ed., § 47-1241.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 5202(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 5202(b) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).
“This act”, referred to in subsection (3), is D.C. Law 11-52.